src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AN_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - dlán - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AN_STEM_1

     dlán+V+Sg+Impv: dlán
     dlán+V+Imm+Pres: dlán-ga
     dlán+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: dlán
     dlán+V+Simp+Pres: dlán-gang
     dlán+V+Dir+Past: dlán-gan
     dlán+V+Rel: dláns
     dlán+V+NonFact: dlánang
     dlán+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: dlán-gang
     dlán+V+Pres+Hab: dlán-ganggang
     dlán+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: dlán-gangang
     dlán+V+Dir+Past+Hab: dlán-giinii
     dlán+V+Interr+Past+Hab: dlán-gaangaa
     dlán+V+Indir+Past+Hab: dlán-gaangaan
     dlán+V+Interr+Fut+Long: dlánäsaa
     dlán+V+Interr+Fut+Short: dlánäs
     dlán+V+Simp+Fut: dlánäsaang
     dlán+V+Imm+Fut: dlánäsga
     dlán+V+Rel+Fut: dlánäsaas
     dlán+V+Fut+NonFact: dlánäsaa.ang
     dlán+V+Interr+Near+Fut: dlánang k̲asaʼáa
     dlán+V+Near+Fut: dlánang k̲asaʼáang
     dlán+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: dlánang k̲asaasdláa
     dlán+V+VNear+Fut: dlánang k̲asaasdláang
     dlán+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: dlánʼuuj
     dlán+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: dlánʼuujang
     dlán+V+Res: dlánäsaaʼuujang
     dlán+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: dlánʼus
     dlán+V+Bias+Interr+Past: dlánʼujaa
     dlán+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: dlánʼuujaangaa
     dlán+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: dlánäsaaʼus
     dlán+V+Cert+Fut: dlánäsaaʼahlans
     dlán+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: dlánäseehl
     dlán+V+Pl+Impv: dlánʼuu
     dlán+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: dlánʼwaa
     dlán+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: dlánʼwaa
     dlán+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: dlánʼwaang
     dlán+V+3pl+Dir+Past: dlánʼwägan
     dlán+V+3pl+Interr+Past: dlánʼaawaa
     dlán+V+3pl+Indir+Past: dlánʼaawaan
     dlán+V+3pl+Rel: dlánʼwaas
     dlán+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: dlánʼaawaas
     dlán+V+3pl+NonFact: dlánʼwaa.ang
     dlán+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: dlánʼaawaa.ang
     dlán+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: dlán-gangʼwaa
     dlán+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: dlán-gangʼwaang
     dlán+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: dlán-gangʼwaa.ang
     dlán+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: dlánʼwägiinii
     dlán+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: dlánʼwägaangaa
     dlán+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: dlánʼwägaangaan
     dlán+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: dlánʼwaaäsaa
     dlán+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: dlánʼwaaäs
     dlán+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: dlánʼwaaäsaang
     dlán+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: dlánʼwaaäsga
     dlán+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: dlánʼwaaäsaas
     dlán+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: dlánʼwaaäsaa.ang
     dlán+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: dlánʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     dlán+V+3pl+Near+Fut: dlánʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     dlán+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: dlánʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     dlán+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: dlánʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     dlán+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: dlánʼwaaʼuuj
     dlán+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: dlánʼwaaʼuujang
     dlán+V+3pl+Res: dlánʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     dlán+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: dlánʼwaaʼus
     dlán+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: dlánʼwaaʼujaa
     dlán+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: dlánʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     dlán+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: dlánʼwaaäsaaʼus
     dlán+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: dlánʼwaaʼahlanggang
     dlán+V+3pl+Cert+Past: dlánʼwaaʼahlanggan
     dlán+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: dlánʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     dlán+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: dlánʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     dlán+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: dlánʼwaaʼahlans
     dlán+V+3pl+Ints+Past: dlánʼaawaaʼahlang
     dlán+V+3pl+Cont: dlánʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     dlán+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: dlánʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     dlán+V+3pl+Rflx: dlánʼwaaʼahl
     dlán+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: dlánʼwaaäseehl
     dlán+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: dlánʼang
     dlán+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: dlánʼangga
     dlán+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: dlánʼang
     dlán+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: dlánʼanggang
     dlán+V+Neg+Dir+Past: dlánʼanggan
     dlán+V+Neg+Interr+Past: dlánʼaangaa
     dlán+V+Neg+Indir+Past: dlánʼaangaan
     dlán+V+Neg+Rel: dlánʼans
     dlán+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: dlánʼaangaas
     dlán+V+Neg+NonFact: dlánʼangang
     dlán+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: dlánʼaangaa.ang
     dlán+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: dlánʼanggang
     dlán+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: dlán-gangʼanggang
     dlán+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: dlán-gangʼangang
     dlán+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: dlánʼanggiinii
     dlán+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: dlánʼanggaangaa
     dlán+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: dlánʼanggaangaan
     dlán+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: dlánʼangäsaa
     dlán+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: dlánʼangäs
     dlán+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: dlánʼangäsaang
     dlán+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: dlánʼangäsga
     dlán+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: dlánʼangäsaas
     dlán+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: dlánʼangäsaa.ang
     dlán+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: dlánang k̲asaaʼáng
     dlán+V+Neg+Near+Fut: dlánang k̲asaaʼánggang
     dlán+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: dlánang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     dlán+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: dlánang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     dlán+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: dlánʼangʼuuj
     dlán+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: dlánʼangʼuujang
     dlán+V+Neg+Res: dlánʼangäsaaʼuujang
     dlán+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: dlánʼangʼus
     dlán+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: dlánʼangʼujaa
     dlán+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: dlánʼangʼuujaangaa
     dlán+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: dlánʼangäsaaʼus
     dlán+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: dlánʼaangʼahlanggang
     dlán+V+Neg+Cert+Past: dlánʼaangʼahlanggan
     dlán+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: dlánʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     dlán+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: dlánʼangäsaaʼahlans
     dlán+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: dlánʼaangʼahlans
     dlán+V+Neg+Ints+Past: dlánʼaangaaʼahlang
     dlán+V+Neg+Cont: dlánʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     dlán+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: dlánʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     dlán+V+Neg+Rflx: dlánʼaangʼahl
     dlán+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: dlánʼangäseehl
     dlán+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: dlánʼangʼuu
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: dlánʼangʼwaa
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: dlánʼangʼwaa
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: dlánʼangʼwaang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: dlánʼangʼwägan
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: dlánʼangʼaawaa
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: dlánʼangʼaawaan
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: dlánʼangʼwaas
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: dlánʼangʼaawaas
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: dlánʼangʼwaa.ang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: dlánʼangʼaawaa.ang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: dlán-gangʼangʼwaa
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: dlán-gangʼangʼwaang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: dlán-gangʼangʼwaa.ang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: dlánʼangʼwägiinii
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: dlánʼangʼwägaangaa
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: dlánʼangʼwägaangaan
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: dlánʼangʼwaaäsaa
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: dlánʼangʼwaaäs
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: dlánʼangʼwaaäsaang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: dlánʼangʼwaaäsga
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: dlánʼangʼwaaäsaas
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: dlánʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: dlánʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: dlánʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: dlánʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: dlánʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: dlánʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: dlánʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Res: dlánʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: dlánʼangʼwaaʼus
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: dlánʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: dlánʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: dlánʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: dlánʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: dlánʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: dlánʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: dlánʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: dlánʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: dlánʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: dlánʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: dlánʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: dlánʼangʼwaaʼahl
     dlán+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: dlánʼangʼwaaäseehl
